Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-41] Employee-beneficiary or
qualified-beneficiary contributions; long-term care benefits plan. (a)
During the period the long-term care benefits plan is in effect, the
employee-beneficiary, if allowed by law, shall authorize the employee-beneficiary's
contribution to be withheld and transmitted to the fund monthly by the
comptroller, employees' retirement system, or finance officer who disburses the
employee-beneficiary's compensation, pension, or retirement pay. If an
employee-beneficiary's monthly contribution to the fund is not withheld and
transmitted to the fund, the employee-beneficiary shall pay the monthly
contribution directly to the board's designated carrier or third-party
administrator as specified by the board.

(b) Qualified-beneficiaries shall pay monthly
contributions directly to the board's designated carrier or third-party
administrator as specified by the board. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next